incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="podtlak__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chatrč__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="beznádej__BASESG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="guč/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sčítan/ec__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cu</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ec</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>com</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ec</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cov</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>com</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>coch</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cami</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Amsterdam__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pridržiavač__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="céd/er__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ru</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ri</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rom</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rov</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rom</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>roch</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rami</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Barbados"><i>Barbados</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dublin"><i>Dublin</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Irán"><i>Irán</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Katar"><i>Katar</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Libanon"><i>Libanon</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Madrid"><i>Madrid</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Omán"><i>Omán</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Singapur"><i>Singapur</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tatran"><i>Tatran</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Uzbekistan"><i>Uzbekistan</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Washington"><i>Washington</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barometer"><i>baromet</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chrapač"><i>chrapač</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chronometer"><i>chronomet</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chumáč"><i>chumáč</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cárach"><i>cárach</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="december"><i>decemb</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delenec"><i>delen</i><par n="sčítan/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="džez"><i>džez</i><par n="Amsterdam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evanjeliár"><i>evanjeliár</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="expozimeter"><i>expozimet</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fermež"><i>fermež</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gag"><i>gag</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hektoliter"><i>hektolit</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hĺbkotlač"><i>hĺbkotlač</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jogurtovač"><i>jogurtovač</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kataster"><i>katast</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiosk"><i>kiosk</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kníhtlač"><i>kníhtlač</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kváder"><i>kvád</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kŕč"><i>kŕč</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luster"><i>lust</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="menšenec"><i>menšen</i><par n="sčítan/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mih"><i>mih</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mládež"><i>mládež</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mocnenec"><i>mocnen</i><par n="sčítan/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nepokoj"><i>nepokoj</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="november"><i>novemb</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="násobenec"><i>násoben</i><par n="sčítan/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obelisk"><i>obelisk</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obruč"><i>obruč</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odmocnenec"><i>odmocnen</i><par n="sčítan/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ostrekovač"><i>ostrekovač</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pech"><i>pech</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plnometer"><i>plnomet</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="posilňovač"><i>posilňovač</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potlač"><i>potlač</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prah"><i>prah</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prízvuk"><i>prízvuk</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="príťaž"><i>príťaž</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pľuzgier"><i>pľuzgier</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samoviazač"><i>samoviazač</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="screening"><i>screening</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sedľač"><i>sedľač</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="semester"><i>semest</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svah"><i>svah</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="súboj"><i>súboj</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="súlož"><i>súlož</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sčítanec"><i>sčítan</i><par n="sčítan/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tender"><i>tend</i><par n="céd/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuk"><i>tuk</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vydaj"><i>vydaj</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vztlak"><i>vztlak</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zem"><i>zem</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čardáš"><i>čardáš</i><par n="pridržiavač__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čierťaž"><i>čierťaž</i><par n="chatrč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ľah"><i>ľah</i><par n="podtlak__n"/></e>
